Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB449.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8902 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 8902. Arrest without warrant.(a) General rule.--For any of the following offenses, a police officer shall, upon view, have the right of arrest without warrant, subject to subsection (a.1), upon probable cause when there is ongoing conduct that imperils the personal security of any person or endangers public or private property:(1) Under Title 18 (relating to crimes and offenses) when such offense constitutes a summary offense:18 Pa.C.S. § 5503 (relating to disorderly conduct).18 Pa.C.S. § 5505 (relating to public drunkenness and similar misconduct).123456789101112131415161718 18 Pa.C.S. § 5507 (relating to obstructing highways and other public passages).18 Pa.C.S. § 6308 (relating to purchase, consumption, possession or transportation of liquor or malt or brewed beverages).(2) Violation of an ordinance of a city of the second class.(a.1) Warning or citation required.--Prior to an arrest under subsection (a), a police officer must issue a warning or a citation that states that the individual's conduct is unlawful and order the individual to cease the unlawful conduct. If the individual refuses or knowingly fails to cease the unlawful conduct, the police officer may arrest the individual subject to the provisions of this section.(b) Guidelines by governmental body.--The right of arrest without warrant under this section shall be permitted only after the governmental body employing the police officer promulgates guidelines to be followed by a police officer when making a warrantless arrest under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0449PN0434 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920